Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.230 and 2006 c 300 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an extractor, except persons taxable as an extractor under any other provision in this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the products, including by-products, extracted for sale or for commercial or industrial use, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so extracted, regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the products, including by-products, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.2404 and 2024 c 261 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(2) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(4) Any person who has claimed the preferential tax rate under this section must reimburse the department for 50 percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if the number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than 90 percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the preferential tax rate is claimed.(5) This section expires January 1, 2034.Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.241 and 2024 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent. For the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.(2) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(3) Pursuant to RCW 82.32.790, this section is contingent on the siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington.(4) Any person who has claimed the preferential rate under this section must reimburse the department for 50 percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section if the number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than 90 percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the preferential rate is claimed.(5) This section expires January 1, 2034, unless the contingency in RCW 82.32.790(2) occurs.Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.250 and 2014 c 97 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.471))0.5181 percent.(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person classified by the federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((.2904))0.31944 percent.(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.255 and 2011 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within the state in the business of providing real estate brokerage services; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((1.5))1.65 percent.(2) The measure of the tax on real estate commissions earned by the real estate firm is the gross commission earned by the particular real estate firm including that portion of the commission paid to brokers, including designated and managing brokers, in the same firm on a particular transaction. However, when a real estate commission on a particular transaction is divided among real estate firms at the closing of the transaction, including a firm located out of state, each firm must pay the tax only upon its respective shares of said commission. Moreover, when the real estate firm has paid the tax as provided herein, brokers, including designated and managing brokers, within the same real estate firm may not be required to pay a similar tax upon the same transaction. If any firm located out of state receives a share of commission on a particular transaction, that company or broker must pay the tax based on the requirements of this section and RCW 82.04.067.(3) For the purposes of this section, "broker," "designated broker," "managing broker," and "real estate firm" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 18.85.011.Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.257 and 2017 c 323 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail or wholesale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(c), as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.471))0.5181 percent in the case of retail sales and by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent in the case of wholesale sales.(2) Persons providing subscription television services or subscription radio services are subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2) on the gross income of the business received from providing such services.(3) For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be engaging within this state in the business of making sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(c), if the person makes sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(c) and the sales are sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW.(4) A person subject to tax under this section is subject to the mandatory electronic filing and payment requirements in RCW 82.32.080.Sec. 8. RCW 82.04.260 and 2023 c 422 s 5 and 2023 c 286 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent;(b) Beginning July 1, 2035, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;(c)(i) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, beginning July 1, 2035, until January 1, 2046, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:(A) Products, not including any cannabis-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and(B) Products comprised of not less than 70 percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2035, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products; and(e) Wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, or field residue and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent.(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent.(5)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was $250,000 or less; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was more than $250,000; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.275 percent through June 30, 2019((, and));(ii) 0.9 percent beginning July 1, 2019, through December 31, 2026; and(iii) 0.99 percent beginning January 1, 2027.(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 70A.380.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 70A.384 RCW, multiplied by the rate of ((3.3))3.63 percent.(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5))1.65 percent thereafter.(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007, through March 31, 2020; ((and))(iii) ((Beginning))0.484 percent beginning April 1, 2020, ((0.484 percent))through December 31, 2026; and(iv) Beginning January 1, 2027, 0.5324 percent, subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (11). The tax rates in (a)(iii) of this subsection and this subsection (11)(a)(((iii)))(iv) applies to all business activities described in this subsection (11)(a).(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.2904 percent through March 31, 2020; and(ii) Beginning April 1, 2020, the following rates, which are subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (11):(A) The rate under RCW 82.04.250(1) on the business of making retail sales of tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and(B)(I) 0.484 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (11)(b) through December 31, 2026; and(II) 0.5324 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (11)(b) beginning January 1, 2027.(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.(d)(i) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534. However, this requirement does not apply to persons reporting under the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (11), so long as that rate remains ((0.484))0.5324 percent, or under any of the tax rates in (b)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (11), so long as those tax rates remain the rate imposed pursuant to RCW 82.04.250(1) and ((0.484))0.5324 percent, respectively.(ii) Nothing in (d)(i) of this subsection (11) may be construed as affecting the obligation of a person reporting under a tax rate provided in this subsection (11) to file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534: (A) Pursuant to another provision of this title as a result of claiming a tax credit or exemption; or (B) pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection (11) as a result of claiming the tax rates in (a)(ii) or (b)(i) of this subsection (11) for periods ending before April 1, 2020.(e)(i) After March 31, 2021, the tax rates under (a)(iii) and (iv) and (b)(ii) of this subsection (11) must be reduced to ((0.357))0.3927 percent provided the conditions in RCW 82.04.2602 are met. The effective date of the rates authorized under this subsection (11)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least 60 days after the department receives the last of the two written notices pursuant to RCW 82.04.2602 (3) and (4).(ii) Both a significant commercial airplane manufacturer separately and the rest of the aerospace industry as a whole, receiving the rate of ((0.357))0.3927 percent under this subsection (11)(e) are subject to the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates required under RCW 49.04.220 by April 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the ((0.357))0.3927 percent rate authorized under this subsection (11)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.(iii) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this subsection (11)(e).(f)(i) Except as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(f)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850. This subsection (11)(f)(ii) continues to apply during the time that a person is subject to the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (11).(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "a significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least 50,000 full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.(12)(a) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, ((and)) 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2026, and 0.31944 percent from January 1, 2027, through June 30, 2045.(b) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; or (iii) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1); as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, ((and)) 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2026, and 0.31944 percent from January 1, 2027, through June 30, 2045.(c) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; or (iv) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, wood products, or products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, ((and)) 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2026, and 0.31944 percent from January 1, 2027, through June 30, 2045.(d) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.2904))0.31944 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within 30 months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than 50 percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having 50 percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.(v) "Timber products" means:(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(g) Nothing in this subsection (12) may be construed to affect the taxation of any activity defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c), defined as a wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060(2), or taxed under RCW 82.04.280(1)(g).(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.Sec. 9. RCW 82.04.260 and 2023 c 422 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent;(b) Beginning July 1, 2035, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;(c)(i) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, beginning July 1, 2035, until January 1, 2046, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:(A) Products, not including any cannabis-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and(B) Products comprised of not less than 70 percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2035, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products; and(e) Wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, or field residue and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent.(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent.(5)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was $250,000 or less; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was more than $250,000; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.275 percent through June 30, 2019((, and));(ii) 0.9 percent beginning July 1, 2019, through December 31, 2026; and(iii) 0.99 percent beginning January 1, 2027.(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 70A.380.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 70A.384 RCW, multiplied by the rate of ((3.3))3.63 percent.(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5))1.65 percent thereafter.(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007, through March 31, 2020; ((and))(iii) ((Beginning))0.484 percent beginning April 1, 2020, ((0.484 percent))through December 31, 2026; and(iv) Beginning January 1, 2027, 0.5324 percent, subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (11). The tax rates in (a)(iii) of this subsection and this subsection (11)(a)(((iii)))(iv) applies to all business activities described in this subsection (11)(a).(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.2904 percent through March 31, 2020; and(ii) Beginning April 1, 2020, the following rates, which are subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (11):(A) The rate under RCW 82.04.250(1) on the business of making retail sales of tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and(B)(I) 0.484 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (11)(b) through December 31, 2026; and(II) 0.5324 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (11)(b) beginning January 1, 2027.(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.(d)(i) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534. However, this requirement does not apply to persons reporting under the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (11), so long as that rate remains ((0.484))0.5324 percent, or under any of the tax rates in (b)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (11), so long as those tax rates remain the rate imposed pursuant to RCW 82.04.250(1) and ((0.484))0.5324 percent, respectively.(ii) Nothing in (d)(i) of this subsection (11) may be construed as affecting the obligation of a person reporting under a tax rate provided in this subsection (11) to file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534: (A) Pursuant to another provision of this title as a result of claiming a tax credit or exemption; or (B) pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection (11) as a result of claiming the tax rates in (a)(ii) or (b)(i) of this subsection (11) for periods ending before April 1, 2020.(e)(i) After March 31, 2021, the tax rates under (a)(iii) and (iv) and (b)(ii) of this subsection (11) must be reduced to ((0.357))0.3927 percent provided the conditions in RCW 82.04.2602 are met. The effective date of the rates authorized under this subsection (11)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least 60 days after the department receives the last of the two written notices pursuant to RCW 82.04.2602 (3) and (4).(ii) Both a significant commercial airplane manufacturer separately and the rest of the aerospace industry as a whole, receiving the rate of ((0.357))0.3927 percent under this subsection (11)(e) are subject to the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates required under RCW 49.04.220 by April 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the ((0.357))0.3927 percent rate authorized under this subsection (11)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.(iii) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this subsection (11)(e).(f)(i) Except as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(f)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850. This subsection (11)(f)(ii) continues to apply during the time that a person is subject to the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (11).(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "a significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least 50,000 full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.(12)(a) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, ((and)) 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2026, and 0.31944 percent from January 1, 2027, through June 30, 2045.(b) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; or (iii) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1); as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, ((and)) 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2026, and 0.31944 percent from January 1, 2027, through June 30, 2045.(c) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; or (iv) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, wood products, or products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, ((and)) 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through December 31, 2026, and 0.31944 percent from January 1, 2027, through June 30, 2045.(d) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.2904))0.31944 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within 30 months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than 50 percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having 50 percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.(v) "Timber products" means:(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(g) Nothing in this subsection (12) may be construed to affect the taxation of any activity defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c), defined as a wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060(2), or taxed under RCW 82.04.280(1)(g).(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and ((0.484))0.5324 percent thereafter.(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.Sec. 10. RCW 82.04.2602 and 2020 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The rate of ((0.357))0.3927 percent authorized pursuant to RCW 82.04.260(11)(e) may be imposed only if the following conditions are met:(1) The department of commerce verifies with the United States trade representative that the United States and the European Union have entered into a written agreement that resolves any world trade organization disputes involving large civil aircraft.(2) Such agreement expressly allows a business and occupation tax rate reduction for commercial airplane manufacturers to ((0.357))0.3927 percent or less.(3) The department of commerce notifies the department in writing that the conditions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section are met and provides a copy of the agreement between the United States and the European Union or other document providing for the business and occupation tax rate reduction to the department.(4) The department of labor and industries notifies the department in writing that a significant commercial airplane manufacturer has at least a three-tenths of one percent aerospace apprenticeship utilization rate of its qualified apprenticeable workforce in Washington, as defined in RCW 49.04.220.(5) Within ((thirty))30 days of receiving the last of the written notices described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the department must provide written notice to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department, that the tax rates in RCW 82.04.260(11)(e) are reduced to ((0.357))0.3927 percent and the effective date of the rate reduction.(6) Any rate reduction to ((0.357))0.3927 percent pursuant to this section and RCW 82.04.260(11)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least ((sixty))60 days after the department receives the last of the written notices described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.(7) For the purpose of this section, "world trade organization disputes involving large civil airplanes" means any disputes filed by the United States or the European Union prior to March 25, 2020, that involve either allegations of subsidies to large civil airplanes, or allegations of taxes imposed by Washington on commercial airplanes, or both.Sec. 11. RCW 82.04.263 and 2009 c 469 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.471))0.5181 percent.(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "cleaning up radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development" means:(a) The activities of handling, storing, treating, immobilizing, stabilizing, or disposing of radioactive waste, radioactive tank waste and capsules, nonradioactive hazardous solid and liquid wastes, or spent nuclear fuel;(b) Spent nuclear fuel conditioning;(c) Removal of contamination in soils and groundwater;(d) Decontamination and decommissioning of facilities; and(e) Services supporting the performance of cleanup. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(e), a service supports the performance of cleanup if it:(i) Is within the scope of work under a clean-up contract with the United States department of energy; or(ii) Assists in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States department of energy under a subcontract entered into with the prime contractor or another subcontractor in furtherance of a clean-up contract between the United States department of energy and a prime contractor.(3) A service does not assist in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States department of energy if the same services are routinely provided to businesses not engaged in clean-up activities, except that the following services are always deemed to contribute to the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States department of energy:(a) Information technology and computer support services;(b) Services rendered in respect to infrastructure; and(c) Security, safety, and health services.(4) The legislature intends that the examples provided in this subsection be used as a guideline when determining whether a service is "routinely provided to businesses not engaged in clean-up activities" as that phrase is used in subsection (3) of this section.(a) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to general accounting services but does apply to performance audits performed for persons cleaning up radioactive waste.(b) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to general legal services but does apply to those legal services that assist in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States department of energy. Thus, legal services provided to contest any local, state, or federal tax liability or to defend a company against a workers' compensation claim arising from a worksite injury do not qualify for the radioactive waste clean-up classification. But, legal services related to the resolution of a contractual dispute between the parties to a clean-up contract between the United States department of energy and a prime contractor do qualify.(c) General office janitorial services do not qualify for the radioactive waste clean-up classification, but the specialized cleaning of equipment exposed to radioactive waste does qualify.Sec. 12. RCW 82.04.270 and 2004 c 24 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale, except persons taxable as wholesalers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.Sec. 13. RCW 82.04.272 and 2013 c 19 s 127 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of warehousing and reselling drugs for human use pursuant to a prescription; as to such persons, the amount of the tax shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))0.1518 percent.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Prescription" and "drug" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0281; and(b) "Warehousing and reselling drugs for human use pursuant to a prescription" means the buying of drugs for human use pursuant to a prescription from a manufacturer or another wholesaler, and reselling of the drugs to persons selling at retail or to hospitals, clinics, health care providers, or other providers of health care services, by a wholesaler or retailer who is registered with the federal drug enforcement administration and licensed by the pharmacy quality assurance commission.Sec. 14. RCW 82.04.280 and 2019 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting, but excluding revenues from network, national, and regional advertising computed either: (i) As a standard deduction that the department must publish by rule by September 30, 2020, and by September 30th of every fifth year thereafter, based on the national average thereof as reported by the United States census bureau's economic census; or (ii) in lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the broadcasting station's total audience as measured by the .5 millivolt/meter signal strength contour for AM radio, the one millivolt/meter or sixty dBu signal strength contour for FM radio, the twenty-eight dBu signal strength contour for television channels two through six, the thirty-six dBu signal strength contour for television channels seven through thirteen, and the forty-one dBu signal strength contour for television channels fourteen through sixty-nine with delivery by wire, satellite, or any other means, if any; (g) engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the publication.Sec. 15. RCW 82.04.285 and 2023 c 284 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied by the rate of ((1.5))1.65 percent.(2) An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax in subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied by the rate of 0.2 percent through June 30, 2024, and 0.26 percent thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2) shall be deposited in the problem gambling account created in RCW 41.05.751. This subsection does not apply to businesses operating contests of chance when the gross income from the operation of contests of chance is less than $50,000 per year.(3)(a) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means any contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW.(b) The term does not include: (i) Race meet for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the Washington horse racing commission, (ii) "amusement game" as defined in RCW 9.46.0201, or (iii) any activity that is not subject to regulation by the gambling commission.(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive jackpot prizes.Sec. 16. RCW 82.04.287 and 2023 c 232 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within the state in the business of manufacturing alternative jet fuel; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(2) Upon every person engaging in making sales, at retail or wholesale, of manufactured alternative jet fuel; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the alternative jet fuel, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(3) For the purposes of this section, "alternative jet fuel" means a fuel that can be blended and used with conventional petroleum jet fuels without the need to modify aircraft engines and existing fuel distribution infrastructure and that has lower greenhouse gas emissions based on a full life-cycle analysis when compared to conventional petroleum jet fuel for which it is capable as serving as a substitute, as certified by the department of ecology using the methods for determining the carbon intensity of fuels under chapter 70A.535 RCW. "Alternative jet fuel" includes jet fuels derived from coprocessed feedstocks at a conventional petroleum refinery as certified by the department of ecology using the methods for determining the carbon intensity of fuels under chapter 70A.535 RCW.(4) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(5)(a) The tax rate under subsections (1) and (2) of this section takes effect on the first day of the first calendar quarter following the month in which the department receives notice from the department of ecology that there are one or more facilities operating in this state with a cumulative production capacity of at least 20,000,000 gallons of alternative jet fuel each year, as required in RCW 70A.535.150.(b) The tax rate expires nine calendar years after the close of the calendar year in which the tax rate under subsections (1) and (2) of this section takes effect.Sec. 17. RCW 82.04.290 and 2020 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing qualifying international investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of:(i)(A) 1.75 percent through September 30, 2025;(B) 2.1 percent beginning October 1, 2025, through December 31, 2026;(C) 1.925 percent beginning January 1, 2027, and thereafter; or(ii) 1.5 percent until January 1, 2027, and a rate of 1.65 percent thereafter for:(A) Any person subject to the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.299;(B) Any person whose gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2), for the immediately preceding calendar year, was less than ((one million dollars))$1,000,000, unless (I) the person is affiliated with one or more other persons, and (II) the aggregate gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2) for all affiliated persons was greater than or equal to ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 for the immediately preceding calendar year; and(C) Hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020, including any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW. This subsection (2)(a)(ii)(C) must not be construed as modifying RCW 82.04.260(10).(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational, and promotional purposes is not considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and is not subject to taxation under this section.(c) ((14.3 percent of the))The revenues collected under (((a)(i) of)) this ((subsection (2)))section must be deposited into the workforce education investment account created in RCW 43.79.195 as follows:(i) For revenues related to filing periods before October 1, 2025, 14.3 percent;(ii) For revenues related to filing periods before January 1, 2027, 11.9 percent; and(iii) For revenues related to filing periods January 1, 2027, and thereafter, 13 percent of revenues collected under this section must be deposited into the workforce education investment account created in RCW 43.79.195.(d)(i) To aid in the effective administration of this subsection (2), the department may require a person claiming to be subject to the 1.5 percent tax rate under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2) to identify all of the person's affiliates, including their department tax registration number or unified business identifier number, as may be applicable, or to certify that the person is not affiliated with any other person. Requests under this subsection (2)(d)(i) must be in writing and may be made electronically.(ii) If the department establishes, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, that a person, with intent to evade the additional taxes due under the ((1.75 percent)) tax rate in (a)(i) of this subsection (2), failed to provide the department with complete and accurate information in response to a written request under (d)(i) of this subsection (2) within ((thirty))30 days of such request, the person is ineligible for the ((1.5 percent)) tax rate in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) for the entire current calendar year and the following four calendar years. However, the department must waive the provisions of this subsection (2)(d)(ii) for any tax reporting period that the person is otherwise eligible for the ((1.5 percent)) tax rate in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) if (A) the department has not previously determined that the person failed to fully comply with (d)(i) of this subsection (2), and (B) within thirty days of the notice of additional tax due as a result of the person's failure to fully comply with (d)(i) of this subsection (2) the department determines that the person has come into full compliance with (d)(i) of this subsection (2). This subsection (2)(d) applies only with respect to persons claiming entitlement to the ((1.5 percent)) tax rate in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) solely by reason of (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2).(e) For the purposes of (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2), if a taxpayer is subject to the reconciliation provisions of RCW 82.04.462(4), and calculates gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2) for the immediately preceding calendar year, or aggregate gross income of the business subject to the tax imposed under this subsection (2) for the immediately preceding calendar year for all affiliated persons, based on incomplete information, the taxpayer must correct the reporting for the current calendar year when complete information for the immediately preceding calendar year is available.(f) For purposes of this subsection (2), the definitions in this subsection (2)(f) apply:(i) "Affiliate" means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person; and(ii) "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of more than eighty percent of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise.(3)(a) Until ((July 1, 2040))December 31, 2026, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of performing aerospace product development for others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.9 percent. Beginning January 1, 2027, until July 1, 2040, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.99 percent.(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(c) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.4461.Sec. 18. RCW 82.04.2905 and 2024 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing child care for periods of less than twenty-four hours, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(2) Until January 1, 2035, this chapter does not apply to amounts received by a child care provider for the care and supervision for periods of less than 24 hours of children:(a) Under 13 years of age; or(b) Under 19 years of age who have a verified special need or are under court supervision as determined by the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 43.216 RCW.(3) The exemption under subsection (2) of this section applies only to persons primarily engaged in the business of providing child care.Sec. 19. RCW 82.04.2906 and 2003 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing intensive inpatient or recovery house residential treatment services for chemical dependency, certified by the department of social and health services, for which payment from the United States or any instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any municipal corporation or political subdivision thereof is received as compensation for or to support those services; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income from such services multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))0.5324 percent.(2) If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section receive income from sources other than those described in subsection (1) of this section or provide services other than those named in subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.Sec. 20. RCW 82.04.2907 and 2021 c 145 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of receiving income from royalties, the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income from royalties multiplied by the rate of ((1.5))1.65 percent.(2) For the purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties" means compensation for the use of intangible property, including charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the intangible property will be used. For purposes of this subsection, "intangible property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses, franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. "Gross income from royalties" does not include compensation for any natural resource, the licensing of prewritten computer software to the end user, or the licensing of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services to the end user as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11).Sec. 21. RCW 82.04.2908 and 2012 c 10 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing room and domiciliary care to residents of an assisted living facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(2) For the purposes of this section, "domiciliary care" has the meaning provided in RCW 18.20.020.Sec. 22. RCW 82.04.294 and 2022 c 172 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or stirling converters, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or stirling converters, or of solar grade silicon, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or stirling converters, or of the solar grade silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))0.3025 percent.(3) Silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, solar grade silicon, or compound semiconductor solar wafers are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651 and 82.12.9651.(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of the periodic table.(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and providing a single direct current electrical output.(c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly into electricity without moving parts.(d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell manufactured from a silicon solar wafer.(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for solar conversion purposes.(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source for use in the generation of electricity.(g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not include silicon used in semiconductors.(h) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.(i) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating substrate on which various semiconducting materials are deposited to produce a photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.(5) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(6) This section expires July 1, 2032.Sec. 23. RCW 82.04.298 and 2011 c 2 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of ((one and one-half))1.65 percent.(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners.(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW 82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative described in (b)(i) of this subsection.(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 24. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 25. Sections 1 through 8, 10 through 16, and 18 through 24 of this act take effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 26. Section 17 of this act takes effect October 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 27. Section 9 of this act takes effect January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 28. Section 8 of this act expires January 1, 2034.--- END ---